Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Sage Grouse Mitigation  Program In-Lieu Fee Fund is established in
the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Sage Grouse Mitigation Program In-Lieu Fee Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in
the fund are continuously  appropriated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for
supporting efforts to restore, protect, enhance or increase  habitat for sage grouse. Expend-
itures from the fund may include but are not limited to expenditures for related adminis-
trative costs, related  research or assessment activities or insurance for sage grouse habitat.
(2) The fund shall consist  of moneys received by the department as fees in lieu of
compensatory mitigation, pursuant  to department rules adopted to implement the Oregon
Sage-Grouse Action Plan and Executive Order 15-18 issued on September 16, 2015.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, fund moneys may be deposited  in the Oregon
Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728. Subject to approval by the State Treasurer,
all or part of Sage Grouse Mitigation Program In-Lieu Fee Fund moneys may be  placed in
an investment pool  designed for intermediate-term investment, as provided by ORS 293.701
to 293.857. Earnings from the investment of fund moneys shall be credited to the fund.
Enrolled House Bill 2069 (HB 2069-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House April 7, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2069 (HB 2069-INTRO) Page 2